Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8366.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-6.5-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-6.5 entitled "Automated
External Defibrillators Required at Public Places and Healthcare Facilities" is hereby amended to
read as follows:
23-6.5-4. Definitions.
The following definitions govern the construction of this chapter:
(1) “Healthcare facility” means any healthcare facility licensed by the department of health
including any institutional health-service provider, facility, or institution, place, building, agency,
or portion thereof, whether a partnership or corporation, whether public or private, whether
organized for profit or not, used, operated, or engaged in providing healthcare services, including,
but not limited to: hospitals; nursing facilities; rehabilitation centers; kidney disease treatment
centers; health maintenance organizations; and facilities providing surgical treatment to patients
not requiring hospitalization (surgi-centers); hospice care; and physician ambulatory-surgery
centers and podiatry ambulatory-surgery centers providing surgical treatment; and any center for
independent living pursuant to § 42-12.2-2. The term “healthcare facility” also includes organized
ambulatory-care facilities that are not part of a hospital but that are organized and operated to
provide healthcare services to outpatients, such as: central-services facilities serving more than one
healthcare facility or healthcare provider; treatment centers; diagnostic centers; outpatient clinics;
infirmaries and health centers; school-based health centers; and neighborhood health centers. The

term “healthcare facility” also includes a practitioner’s (physician, dentist, or other healthcare
provider) office or group of practitioners’ offices (whether owned and/or operated by a hospital or
an affiliate of a hospital or an individual practitioner, alone or as a member of a partnership,
professional service corporation, organization, or association).
(2) “Public place” means an enclosed area capable of holding three hundred (300) people
or more and to which the public is invited or in which the public is permitted, including, but not
limited to: banks; bars; educational facilities; laundromats; public or private golf courses; public
transportation facilities; reception areas; restaurants; retail food production and marketing
establishments; retail service establishments; retail stores; shopping malls; sports arenas;
government offices; theaters; and waiting rooms. A private residence is not a “public place” unless
it is used as a childcare or adult daycare facility.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006077
========
LC006077 - Page 2 of 3